be: Крупеня, Крупнік, Kулеш
pl: Krupnik

en: Cold soups
da: Kolde supper
de: Kalte Suppen
es: Sopas frías
fi: kylmät keitot
fr: Soupes froides, Soupe froide
he: מרקים קרים
hr: Hladne juhe
it: Zuppe fredde
lt: Šaltos sriubos
nl: Koude soepen
pt: Sopas frias
ru: Холодные супы

en: Ajoblanco, Ajo blanco
es: Ajoblanco, Ajo blanco
fr: Ajoblanco, Ajo blanco
hr: Ajoblanco
zh: 杏仁蒜蓉冷汤

en: Gazpacho, Cold gazpacho soups
de: Gazpacho, Gaspacho
es: Gazpachos
fi: gazpacho
fr: Gaspacho, Gaspachos, gazpacho, Soupes froides type Gaspacho, Soupes froides type Gazpacho
hr: Gazpacho
it: Gazpacho
ja: ガスパッチョ, ガスパチョ
nl: Gazpachos

en: Salmorejo
xx: Salmorejo
es: Salmorejos
ja: サルモレッホ, サルモレホ

en: Nabe, Nabemono
fr: Nabe

xx: Oden
en: Oden

en: Cream soups
bg: Крем супа
ca: Sopes cremoses
de: Cremesuppen
es: Sopas de tipo crema, Sopas con crema
fi: kermaiset keitot
fr: Veloutés
hr: Krem juhe
it: Vellutate
ja: クリームスープ
lt: Kreminės sriubos
nl: Crèmesoepen
pt: Cremes de sopas
ru: Крем-супы

en: Cream of mushroom soups
es: Cremas de setas
fr: Veloutés de champignons
hr: Krem juhe od gljiva
lt: Kreminės sriubos su grybais
nl: Paddestoelencremesoepen

en: Cream of champignon mushroom soups
es: Cremas de champiñones
fr: Veloutés de champignons de Paris
hr: Krem juhe od gljiva od šampinjona
lt: Kreminės sriubos su pievagrybiais
nl: Champignonsoepen

en: Cream of vegetable soups
de: Gemüsecremesuppen
es: Cremas de verduras y hortalizas, Cremas de verduras, Cremas de hortalizas
fi: kasviskermakeitot
fr: Veloutés de légumes
hr: Krem juhe od povrća
it: Vellutate di verdura
lt: Kreminės sriubos su daržovėmis
nl: Groentecrèmesoepen

en: Cream of carrot soups
es: Cremas de zanahoria
fr: Veloutés de carottes
hr: Krem juhe od mrkve
lt: Kreminės sriubos su morkomis
nl: Wortelcrèmesoepen

en: Cream of leek soups
es: Cremas de puerro
fr: Veloutés de poireaux
hr: Krem juhe od poriluka
lt: Kreminės sriubos su porais
nl: Preicrèmesoepen

en: Cream of pumpkin soups
es: Cremas de calabaza
fi: kurpitsakermakeitot
fr: Veloutés de potiron
hr: Krem juhe od bundeve
it: Vellutata di zucca
lt: Kreminės sriubos su moliūgais
nl: Pompoencrèmesoepen

en: Cream of tomato soups
de: Tomatencremesuppen
es: Cremas de tomate
fi: tomaattikeitto
fr: Veloutés de tomates
hr: Krem juhe od rajčice
it: Vellutata di pomodori
lt: Kreminės sriubos su pomidorais
nl: Tomatencrèmesoepen

en: Cream of zucchini soups, Cream of courgette soups
es: Cremas de calabacines
fr: Veloutés de courgettes
hr: Krem juhe od tikvica
lt: Kreminės sriubos su cukinijomis
nl: Courgettecrèmesoepen

en: broths, stock, bouillon, Stocks
af: bouillon
ar: زومات
az: Bulyon
ba: һурпа
be: Булён
bg: Бульон
bn: সুরুয়া
ca: brou
cs: vývar
da: fond
de: Brühen, Brühe, Bouillons
el: ζωμός
eo: buljono
es: caldos, caldo
et: puljong
eu: Salda
fa: گوشتابه
fi: liemi
fr: bouillons, fond, Bouillon
ga: anraith
gd: brot
gl: Caldo
he: ציר
hi: यखनी
hr: Čorbe
hu: Húsleves
hy: արգանակ
ia: Bouillon
id: Kaldu
io: Buliono
is: seyði
it: brodo
ja: ブイヨン
ko: 브로스
lb: Britt
li: Boeljóng
lt: Sultinys
mk: бујо́н
ms: kaldu
mt: brodu
nb: buljong
nl: bouillon, Bouillons
nn: buljong
pa: ਸ਼ੋਰਬਾ
pl: Bulion, Wywar
pt: caldo
ro: supă
ru: бульон
sq: supë
sv: buljong
tl: Tsaa ng karneng baka
tr: Etsuyu
uk: Бульйон
uz: sho'rva
vi: canh
yi: יויך
zh: 清汤

en: Dehydrated broths, Dehydrated stocks, Dehydrated bouillons
de: Fertigbrühen, Instant-brühen, Getrocknete Brühen
es: Caldos deshidratados
fi: tiivistetyt liemet
fr: Bouillons déshydratés, bouillons lyophilisés, court-bouillon
hr: Dehidrirane bujoni
it: Brodi disidratati
lt: Dehidratuoti sultiniai
nl: Gevriesdroogde bouillons

en: Bouillon cubes, Stock cubes
de: Brühwürfel
es: Caldos en cubitos, Cubos de caldo, Pastilla de caldo, Cubitos de caldo, Caldos en pastillas
fi: liemikuutiot
fr: Bouillons cubes, bouillons en cube
hr: Bujon kocke
it: Dadi da brodo
lt: Sultinio kubeliai, Bulijono kubeliai
nl: Bouillonblokjes
pl: Kostki bulionowe, Kostki rosołowe, Kostka rosołowa, Kostka bulionowa

en: Bouillon powders, Stock powders, Bouillon granules, Stock granules
de: Brühpulver, Brühe in Pulverform, Gekörnte Brühen, Granulat für Brühen
es: Caldos en polvo, Caldos granulados, Caldos solubles instantáneos
fi: liemijauheet
fr: Bouillons en poudre
hr: Bujon u prahu
lt: Sultinio milteliai
nl: Boullons in poeder
pl: Bulion w proszku